Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202586-472
988 Suicide and Crisis Lifeline; legislative findings; Department of Health and Human Services; duties.

(1) The Legislature finds that:

(a) In 2020, Congress enacted the federal National Suicide Hotline Designation Act of 2020, Public Law 116-172. This federal act designated 988 as the universal three-digit telephone number within the United States for the purpose of the national suicide prevention and mental health crisis hotline system operating since 2005 through the National Suicide Prevention Lifeline;

(b) The three-digit 988 code became operational nationally in 2022, and is a more universal and easy-to-remember way to connect individuals experiencing mental health-related distress with mental health care professionals; and

(c) The 988 Suicide and Crisis Lifeline is a national effort, organized at the state level, and serves as an alternative to 911 in addressing the growing need for mental health-related crisis intervention in order to save lives.

(2) The Department of Health and Human Services shall:

(a) Oversee administration of the 988 Suicide and Crisis Lifeline in Nebraska, including contracting for services provided by trained counselors, call-center operators, and other service providers helping operate the 988 Suicide and Crisis Lifeline network in the state; and

(b) Coordinate and cooperate with the Public Service Commission to ensure that the 988 Suicide and Crisis Lifeline has the capability to connect individuals to the 911 service system and also receive communications from the 911 service system as provided under subdivision (6) of section 86-1060.

Laws 2024, LB1200, § 66;

Laws 2025, LB362, § 10.